Wyoming, session 2025, SF0173.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-1001 through 21-2-1003 are
created to read:
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347

ARTICLE 10
EDUCATIONAL BANKRUPTCY

21-2-1001. Educational bankruptcy act.

This act may be cited as the "Wyoming Educational
Bankruptcy Act."

21-2-1002. Petition for educational bankruptcy;
school district eligibility; duties of the state
superintendent of public instruction.

(a) Effective May 1, 2027, the state superintendent
of public instruction may petition the district court in
the county in which a school district is located to make a
determination that the school district is educationally
bankrupt under this act if the school district meets all of
the following criteria in two (2) of the last three (3)
school years if the school district has a student
enrollment of more than eight hundred (800) students or in
three (3) of the last four (4) school years if the school
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
district has a student enrollment of eight hundred (800)
students or less:

(i) Sixty percent (60%) or more of grade three
(3) students enrolled in the school district score basic or
below basic on the English language arts portion of the
statewide assessment administered pursuant to W.S.
21-2-304(a)(v);

(ii) Fifty percent (50%) or more of grade eight
(8) students enrolled in the school district score basic or
below basic on the mathematics portion of the statewide
assessment administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v);

(iii) Twenty-five percent (25%) or more of grade
ten (10) students enrolled in the school district score
below basic on the English language arts, mathematics and
science portions of the statewide assessment administered
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v).

(b) Effective May 1, 2027, with the support of twelve
and one half percent (12.5%) or more of the students
enrolled in a school district as evidenced by the written
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
signatures of the students' parent or guardian, any parent
or guardian of a student attending a public school in this
state may petition the district court in the county in
which a school district is located to make a determination
that the school district is educationally bankrupt under
this act if the school district meets the criteria
specified in subsection (a) of this section. For purposes
of demonstrating the parental and guardian support required
by this subsection, the signatures shall be obtained
between March 1 and May 1 and any petition filed under this
subsection shall be filed not later than May 1 in the year
the signatures were collected. Any parent or guardian that
files a petition with the district court under this
subsection, shall send a certified copy of the petition to
the state superintendent of public instruction and the
school district at issue within ten (10) business days of
filing with the district court. The state superintendent
may file a petition to intervene as a party to the
proceeding.

(c) In determining the application of subsection (a)
of this section, students with disabilities as identified
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., taking an alternative
assessment in accordance with an individual education plan
shall be excluded from the calculations.

(d) For school districts with participation rates on
any portion of the statewide assessment administered
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) that are less than ninety
percent (90%) of the total students enrolled in the school
district, the district court, in consultation with the
state superintendent of public instruction, may consider a
portion of students who do not participate in the statewide
assessment as scoring basic or below basic for determining
the application of subsection (a) of this section.

(e) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall consider all of the following in determining whether
to petition the district court under subsection (a) of this
section:

(i) The academic benefit to the students
enrolled in the school district by placing the school
district in educational bankruptcy;

SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
(ii) The negative implications for the students
enrolled in the school district by placing the school
district in educational bankruptcy;

(iii) Cultural factors that may impact the
effectiveness of educational bankruptcy and that may impact
student performance on the statewide assessment
administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v);

(iv) Actions taken by the school district to
improve student performance on the statewide assessment
administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v).

(f) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall post publicly on the Wyoming department of
education's website a list of school districts that meet
one (1) or more of the criteria in paragraphs (a)(i)
through (iii) of this section.

(g) Not later than December 1, 2025, and not later
than each December 1 thereafter, the state superintendent
of public instruction shall report the number of school
districts that qualify for educational bankruptcy pursuant
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
to subsection (a) of this section and make recommendations
to the joint education interim committee, including, but
not limited to, whether the limitation on the number of
school districts that may be placed in educational
bankruptcy pursuant to W.S. 21-2-1003(h) should be
modified. The joint education interim committee shall
report its recommendations, if any, to the legislature
during the immediately succeeding legislative session.

(h) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall promulgate rules necessary to administer this
section.

21-2-1003. Duties of the district court in
educational bankruptcies.

(a) The district court shall consider petitions filed
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-1002 in date order based on the
filing date of the petition. The district court shall hold
a hearing to determine if placing the school district in
educational bankruptcy is in the best interest of the
students enrolled in the school district.

SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
(b) Upon finding educational bankruptcy is in the
best interest of the students enrolled in the qualified
school, the district court shall appoint a trustee to
manage the school district.

(c) The trustee appointed under subsection (b) of
this section shall have the following duties and authority:

(i) Shall request input on improvement of
student performance and management of the school district
from the state superintendent and the local board of
trustees;

(ii) Shall remove the school district
superintendent from his position;

(iii) Shall remove the authority of the school
district board of trustees to manage the school district,
making the board of trustees an advisory board to the
appointed trustee;

(iv) May remove any other administrators or
school principals from their positions;
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347

(v) May appoint an independent advisory board.

(d) Any decision of the trustee shall be considered a
final decision which may be appealed to the district court.
The court may, on application or on its own motion, stay
the decision of the trustee pending appeal.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act,
where Indian children, as defined by W.S. 14-6-702(a)(iv),
comprise at least fifty percent (50%) of the school
district's enrollment, the tribal business council shall
have the right to intervene as a party in a petition for
educational bankruptcy and provide a plan for improvement.
The trustee and the district court shall give deference to
the plan submitted by the tribal council in accordance with
this subsection.

(f) The district court shall release a school
district from educational bankruptcy if, at the end of the
school year, less than fifty percent (50%) of grade three
(3) students enrolled in the school district score basic or
below basic on the English language arts portion of the
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
statewide assessment administered pursuant to W.S.
21-2-304(a)(v), and one (1) of the following conditions is
met:

(i) Less than forty percent (40%) of grade eight
(8) students enrolled in the school district score basic or
below basic on the mathematics portion of the statewide
assessment administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v);

(ii) Less than twenty percent (20%) of grade ten
(10) students enrolled in the school district score below
basic on the English language arts, mathematics and science
portions of the statewide assessment administered pursuant
to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v). Each portion of the statewide
assessment shall be considered individually under this
paragraph.

(g) If after six (6) years of a school district being
in educational bankruptcy and under the supervision of a
trustee appointed under subsection (b) of this section, a
school district does not meet the criteria contained in
subsection (f) of this section, the state superintendent of
public instruction or the school district's board of
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
trustees may petition the district court to release the
school district from educational bankruptcy. Upon a
petition filed under this subsection, the district court
shall release the school district from educational
bankruptcy upon finding continuation of educational
bankruptcy under the appointed trustee will not result in
academic improvement in the school district.

(h) In no event shall the number of school districts
found to be educationally bankrupt under this section
exceed six (6) school districts statewide and no more than
three (3) school districts per year shall be found to be
educationally bankrupt statewide.

Section 2. W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) by creating a new
subparagraph (M) and 21-2-802 by creating a new subsection
(n) are amended to read:

21-2-304. Duties of the state board of education.

(a) The state board of education shall:

SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
(v) Through the state superintendent and in
consultation and coordination with local school districts,
implement a statewide assessment system comprised of a
coherent system of measures that when combined, provide a
reliable and valid measure of individual student
achievement for each public school and school district
within the state, and the performance of the state as a
whole. Statewide assessment system components shall be in
accordance with requirements of the statewide education
accountability system pursuant to W.S. 21-2-204.
Improvement of teaching and learning in schools, attaining
student achievement targets for performance indicators
established under W.S. 21-2-204 and fostering school
program improvement shall be the primary purposes of
statewide assessment of student performance in Wyoming.
The statewide assessment system shall:

(M) Effective school year 2026-2027, and
each school year thereafter, not be modified in a manner
that would substantially affect assessment results used for
the purposes of W.S. 21-2-1002. In even numbered years, the
joint education interim committee may sponsor legislation
SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
for submission at the following general session to
authorize modification of the statewide assessment.

21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.

(n) The board may revoke, suspend, deny or refuse to
renew certification for engaging in fraud, cheating or
unfair practices, committed after July 1, 2025, in
assisting students on the statewide assessment, required
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v), upon its own motion or
upon the petition of any local board of trustees. No
certificate shall be revoked or suspended under this
subsection without a hearing conducted in accordance with
the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, unless the person
holding the certification waives the right to a hearing.

SF0173

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0347
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0173